Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 16 Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Undertakers and Crematories

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to prepaid or prearranged funeral contracts, see §§

26-32-101

through

26-32-103

.

For general provisions relative to public health and safety, see title 35.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Funeral Directors and Embalmers § 1 et seq.

Validity of statute or ordinance in relation to funeral directors and embalmers, 89 ALR2d 1338.

Construction and application of zoning regulations in connection with funeral homes, 92 ALR3d 328.

Civil liability of undertaker in connection with transportation, burial or safeguarding of body, 53 ALR4th 360.

Dead bodies: liability for improper manner of reinterment, 53 ALR4th 394.

Construction and effect of contracts or insurance policies providing preneed coverage of burial expense or services, 67 ALR4th 36.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes or ordinances regulating perpetual-care trust funds of cemeteries and mausoleums, 54 ALR5th 681.